Utah statutes.
38-1-21.   Advance payments -- Effect on subcontractor's lien.

No payment made prior to the time when the same is due under the terms and conditions of the contract shall be valid for the purpose of defeating, diminishing or discharging any lien in favor of any person except the contractor; but as to any such lien such payment shall be deemed as if not made, notwithstanding that the contractor to whom it was paid may thereafter abandon his contract or be or become indebted to the owner for damages for nonperformance of his contract or otherwise.

